Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4451.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16. It shall be unlawful for an An employer or any an officer or agent of an employer (1) to interfere shall not do any of the following: (a) Interfere with, restrain, or coerce employees in the exercise of their rights guaranteed in under section 8. ; (2) to initiate (b) Initiate, create, dominate, contribute to, or interfere with the formation or administration of , any a labor organization. : Provided, That This subdivision does not prohibit an employer shall not be prohibited from permitting employees to confer with him the employer during working hours without loss of time or pay. ; (3) to discriminate (c) Discriminate in regard to hire, hiring, terms, or other conditions of employment in order to encourage or discourage membership in any a labor organization. ; (4) to encourage (d) Encourage membership in, or initiate, create, dominate, or contribute to, a company union. ; (5) to discriminate (e) Discriminate against any an employee because he the employee has given testimony or instituted a proceeding under this act. ; or (6) to refuse (f) Refuse to bargain collectively with the a representative of his the employer's employees, subject to the provisions of section 26. (g) Offer or grant the status of a permanent replacement employee to an individual because the individual performs bargaining unit work for the employer during a labor dispute, or otherwise offer or grant an individual an employment preference because the individual was employed or indicated a willingness to be employed during a labor dispute over an individual who meets all of the following requirements: (i) Was an employee of the employer at the commencement of the labor dispute. (ii) Exercised the right to join, assist, or engage in other concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection through the labor organization involved in the labor dispute. (iii) Is working for, or has unconditionally offered to return to work for, the employer.